District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.11

Liquidation of merchant banks in general.

A merchant bank shall not be liquidated except as provided by this chapter or in accordance with the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 311, 48 DCR 3244

History